Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Chapter 10
UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE — EFFECTIVE DATE AND REPEALER

Sec.

§ 28-10-101. Effective date.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this act shall become effective at midnight on December 31, 1967.

Section 28-9-408[, Idaho Code,] of this act shall become effective at 8:00 a.m. on December 26, 1967.

Except as provided in subsection (2) above and in section 28-9-408[, Idaho Code], this act applies to transactions entered into and events occurring after midnight on December 31, 1967.

History.

1967, ch. 161,§ 10-101, p. 351.

§ 28-10-102. Specific repealer — Provision for transition.

The following acts and parts of acts and all other acts and parts of acts inconsistent herewith are hereby repealed:

Chapter 15 of title 26, Idaho Code, as amended;
(a)(i) Chapter 15 of title 26, Idaho Code, as amended;

Chapters 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10 (as amended), 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16 and 17 of title 27, Idaho Code;

Chapter 4 of title 30, Idaho Code;

Chapter 11 of title 45, Idaho Code, as amended, except section 45-1102;

Chapter 12 of title 45, Idaho Code;

Chapter 14 of title 45, Idaho Code;

Chapter 6 of title 62, Idaho Code;

Chapters 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 and 6 of title 64, Idaho Code;

Chapter 7 of title 64, Idaho Code;

Chapter 8 of title 64, Idaho Code, as amended;

Chapter 9 of title 64, Idaho Code, as amended;

Chapter 10 of title 64, Idaho Code; and

Chapter 1 of title 69, Idaho Code, as amended.

Sections 9-505(4), 18-3705, 26-1003, 26-1005, 26-1006, 26-1008, 26-1013, 26-1015, 26-1016 and 45-1301, Idaho Code.

Transactions validly entered into before the effective date specified in section 28-10-101[, Idaho Code,] and the rights, duties and interests flowing therefrom remain valid thereafter and may be terminated, completed, consummated or enforced as required or permitted by any statute or other law amended or repealed by this act as though such repeal or amendment had not occurred.

History.

1967, ch. 161,§ 10-102, p. 351.

§ 28-10-103. General repealer.

Except as provided in the following section, all acts and parts of acts inconsistent with this act are hereby repealed.

History.

1967, ch. 161,§ 10-103, p. 351.

§ 28-10-104. Laws not repealed. [Repealed.]